Hawaii statutes.
§484-9 Annual report. (a) Within
thirty days after each annual anniversary date of an order registering
subdivided lands, the subdivider shall file a report in the form prescribed by
the rules of the director of commerce and consumer affairs. The report shall
reflect any material changes in information contained in the original
application for registration.

(b) The director at the director's option may
permit the filing of annual reports within thirty days after the anniversary
date of the consolidated registration in lieu of the anniversary date of the
original registration. [L 1967, c 223, §9; HRS §484-9; am L 1982, c 204, §8; am
L 1983, c 124, §17; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next